New York, session 2025-2026, A6517.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The division of criminal justice services shall include in 2 the crimes against revenue program each county within the state and 3 shall provide funding to each such county. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 5 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 6 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 7 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 8 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10226-01-5